Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 6 Connecting Carriers Generally

46-9-210.
Duty of railroad companies to put on sale and to sell tickets of connecting roads and to check baggage over such roads.

No railroad company having an office or agency within this state shall refuse to put on sale or refuse to sell any ticket of any other railroad company with which the same may be directly or indirectly connected, at the price or rate fixed by the commission, for passage over lines of such connecting roads, less such amount as may be directed to be deducted from such rate by any one or more of said connecting lines. It shall be unlawful, after the sale of such ticket, to refuse to issue checks for baggage over such connecting lines, to the extent that the baggage may be allowed to be checked under the ordinary rules and regulations of said companies.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 155, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2299; Civil Code 1910, § 2753; Code 1933, § 18-501.

46-9-211.
Duty of railroad companies to place their tickets for sale with connecting roads; duty to accept such tickets and to receive and transport baggage checked upon such tickets; security for tickets.

No railroad company operating or doing business wholly or partly within this state shall:

Refuse to put on sale with the agents of any other railroad company with which it may be connected, whether directly or indirectly, tickets for any point upon its lines of road;

Refuse to receive such tickets for passage over its lines; or

Refuse to receive and transport baggage which may be checked upon said tickets so sold.

Any company so placing its tickets on sale may demand reasonable security to secure the price of such tickets so placed on sale, and may demand, from time to time, such renewals of deposits or other security as will protect it from any loss from the sale of such tickets.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 155, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2300; Civil Code 1910, § 2754; Code 1933, § 18-502.

46-9-212.
Switching off and delivering to connecting roads all cars consigned to points over or beyond the connecting roads.

All railroad companies in this state shall, at the terminus or at any intermediate point, be required to switch off and deliver to connecting roads, in the yard of such roads, all cars passing over their lines which cars contain goods or freights consigned, without rebate or deception, by any route, at the option of the shipper, according to customary or published rates, to any point over or beyond such connecting road.

Any failure by a railroad company to switch off and deliver cars as required by subsection (a) of this Code section with reasonable diligence, according to the route by which such goods or freights were consigned, shall be deemed and taken as a conversion in law of such goods or freights, and shall give a right of action to the owner or consignee for the value of the goods or freights, with interest, and not less than 10 percent nor more than 25 percent for expenses and damages, provided that if the defendant in any action brought under this Code section or Code Section 46-9-213 asserts as a defense that the plaintiff has accepted a rebate or practiced fraud or deception in regard to the rate, it shall be a complete reply to such defense if the plaintiff can prove that the defendant or its agents have allowed a rebate or practiced fraud or deception in regard to the rate from the same competing point against the rival line.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 94, § 1; Code 1882, § 719q; Civil Code 1895, § 2212; Civil Code 1910, § 2655; Code 1933, § 93-409.

46-9-213.
Discrimination by railroad companies in freight-transportation rates charged to connecting lines and routes.

No railroad company shall discriminate in its rates or tariffs for freights in favor of any line or route connected with it as against any other line or route; nor, when a part of its own line is sought to be run in connection with any other route, shall such company discriminate against such connecting line or in favor of the balance of its own line. Rather, such company shall charge the same rates for all and shall afford the usual and customary facilities for interchange of freights to patrons of all routes or lines alike. Any refusal of the same shall afford a right of action similar to that provided in Code Section 46-9-212.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 94, § 3; Code 1882, § 719s; Civil Code 1895, § 2214; Civil Code 1910, § 2657; Code 1933, § 93-411.

Cross references.

Prohibition against unjust discrimination in freight-transportation rates by common carriers, §

46-9-52

.

46-9-214.
Applicability of Code Sections 46-9-212 and 46-9-213 to interstate shipments and consignments.

Code Sections 46-9-212 and 46-9-213 shall not apply to shipments or consignments of freights from points beyond the limits of this state, except such as come by sea.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 94, § 5; Code 1882, § 719u; Civil Code 1895, § 2216; Civil Code 1910, § 2659; Code 1933, § 93-412.

46-9-215.
Duty of railroad companies to receive freight cars from connecting roads; measure of damages for failure or refusal to receive cars.

All railroad companies in this state, at the terminus or at any intermediate point, shall receive from the connecting road all cars containing freight consigned to any point on the road to which the same is offered and shall transport the cars to their destination with reasonable diligence. Any failure or refusal to comply with this requirement shall give to the consignee, the shipper, or the owner of such goods and freight a right of action against the company so refusing; and the damages received in such action shall not be less than 10 percent nor more than 25 percent of the value of the goods so refused to be received.

History.

Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 145, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2302; Civil Code 1910, § 2756; Code 1933, § 18-504.

46-9-216.
Civil penalty.

For every violation of any of the provisions of Code Section 46-9-210 or 46-9-211, the railroad company shall be subject to a civil penalty of $1,000.00, which may be recovered in any superior or city court of the county in which such violation may occur. An action may be brought by the railroad company whose road may be discriminated against or by the person offering to buy a ticket over such road. The penalty provided for in this Code section may be recovered by each of these parties; and recovery by one shall not be a bar to recovery by the other.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 155, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2301; Civil Code 1910, § 2755; Code 1933, § 18-503.